Louisiana, session 2026, HB583.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:1711.6(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1711.6. Registering entity
A. A registering entity is not required to shall offer or to accept a request for
security registration in beneficiary form. If a registration in beneficiary form is
offered by a registering entity, the The owner requesting registration in beneficiary
form assents to the protections given to the registering entity by this Chapter.
* * *